Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1602
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act, the definitions found in sections 46-1603 to 46-1634 apply.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 2.